nl: Type tang: Bamboe; Barbecue/grillen; Koken/algemeen gebruik; IJs; Pasta/spaghetti; Gebak; Salade; Schaar; Serveren/buffet; Siliconenpunt; Suiker; Pincet; Overig
de: Zangentyp: Bambus; Grillen; Kochen/Allzweck; Eis; Nudeln/Spaghetti; Gebäck; Salat; Schere; Servieren/Buffet; Silikonkopf; Zucker; Pinzette; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип щипки: Бамбук; За барбекю/печене на скара; Готварско/общо предназначение; Лед; За паста/спагети; За сладкарски изделия; За салата; Ножица; За сервиране/бюфет; Със силиконов връх; Захар; Пинсета; Друго
el: Τύπος λαβίδας: Μπαμπού; Μπάρμπεκιου/ψήσιμο στη σχάρα; Μαγειρική/γενικής χρήσης; Για πάγο; Ζυμαρικά/σπαγγέτι; Ζύμη; Σαλάτα; Ψαλίδι; Σερβίρισμα/μπουφές; Σιλικονούχα άκρη; Για ζάχαρη; Τσιμπιδάκι; Άλλο
ko: 집게 유형: 대나무; 바비큐/그릴; 요리/일반 용도; 얼음; 파스타/스파게티; 페이스트리; 샐러드; 가위; 서빙/뷔페; 실리콘 팁; 설탕; 족집게; 기타
lt-LT: Žnyplių tipas: Bambukas; Grilis / kepsninė; Maisto gaminimas / bendrosios paskirties; Ledui; Makaronai / spagečiai; Pyragaičiai; Salotos; Žirklinis; Patiekimas / švediškas stalas; Silikono galiukais; Cukrui; Pincetas; Kita
pl: Typ szczypiec: Bambus; Grillowanie; Uniwersalne / kuchenne; Do lodu; Do makaronu / spaghetti; Cukiernicze; Do sałatek; Nożycowe; Serwisowe / bufetowe; Z silikonowymi końcówkami; Do cukru; Pęsetowe; Inne
th: ประเภทของที่คีบ: ไผ่; บาร์บีคิว/ย่าง; การทำอาหาร/ใช้งานทั่วไป; น้ำแข็ง; พาสต้า/สปาเก็ตตี้; ขนมอบ; สลัด; กรรไกร; สำหรับเสิร์ฟ/บุฟเฟ่ต์; ปลายซิลิโคน; น้ำตาล; แหนบ; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ kleští: Bambusové; Grilování/opékání; Vaření / univerzální použití; Na led; Těstoviny/špagety; Pečivo; Saláty; Nůžkového typu; Servírování/bufet; Silikonová špička; Na cukr; Pinzeta; Jiné
nb: Tang-type: Bambus; Grilling/grilling; Matlaging/generell bruk; Is; Pasta/spaghetti; Kake; Salat; Saks; Servering/buffé; Silikontipp; Sukker; Pinsett; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta klešč: Bambus; Žar/peka na žaru; Kuhanje/splošna uporaba; Ribolov na ledu; Testenine/špageti; Pecivo; Solata; Škarje; Serviranje/bife; S silikonsko konico; Sladkor; Pinceta; Druga
zh-TW: 夾具類型: 竹夾; 燒烤/炙烤; 烹飪/通用; 冰夾; 義大利麵; 糕點; 沙拉; 剪刀型; 公用/自助; 矽膠頭; 糖夾; 美容鑷子; 其他
zh-CN: 夹子类型: 竹夹; 烧烤夹; 烹饪/通用夹; 冰块夹; 意面夹; 糕点夹; 沙拉夹; 剪刀夹; 分餐/自助餐夹; 硅胶头夹; 方糖夹; 镊子; 其他
en: Tong type: Bamboo; Barbecue/grilling; Cooking/general purpose; Ice; Pasta/spaghetti; Pastry; Salad; Scissor; Serving/buffet; Silicone-tipped; Sugar; Tweezer; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de pinça: Bambu; Churrasco/grelha; Cozimento/uso geral; Gelo; Massas/espaguete; Confeitaria; Saladas; Tesoura; Serviço/buffet; Pontas de silicone; Açúcar; Pinça; Outro
ja: トングの種類: 竹トング; バーベキュー/グリル; 調理/一般用途; アイストング; パスタ/スパゲッティ; ペストリー; サラダ; ハサミ; サービング/ビュッフェ; シリコーンチップ; シュガートング; ピンセット; その他
es: Tipo de pinzas: Bambú; Barbacoa/parrilla; Cocina/uso general; Hielo; Pasta/espaguetis; Pasteles; Ensalada; Tijeras; Servicio/buffet; Con punta de silicona; Azúcar; Pinzas; Otros
da: Tangværktøjstype: Bambus; Barbecue/grillning; Madlavning/generelt formål; Is; Pasta/spaghetti; Bagværk; Salat; Saks; Servering/buffet; Silikonespids; Sukker; Pincet; Andet
tr: Maşa tipi: Bambu; Barbekü/ızgara; Yemek pişirme/genel amaçlı; Buz; Makarna/spagetti; Hamur işi; Salata; Makas; Servis/açık büfe; Silikon uçlu; Şeker; Cımbız; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul cleștelui: Bambus; Barbecue/grătar; Gătit/uz general; Gheață; Paste/spaghete; Patiserie; Salată; Foarfecă; Servire/bufet; Vârf de silicon; Zahăr; Pensetă; Altele
sk-SK: Typ klieští: Bambus; Na opekanie/grilovanie; Na varenie/všeobecné použitie; Ľad; Na cestoviny/špagety; Na pečivo; Na šalát; Nožnice; Servírovacie/bufetové; So silikónovou špičkou; Cukor; Pinzeta; Iné
ru: Тип щипцов: Бамбуковые; Барбекю/гриль; Кулинарные/общего назначения; Для льда; Паста/спагетти; Выпечка; Салат; Ножницы; Сервировка/шведский стол; Силиконовые наконечники; Для сахара; Пинцет; Другие
pt-PT: Tipo de pinça: Bambu; Churrasco/grelhado; Cozinhar/uso geral; No gelo; Massa/esparguete; Pastelaria; Salada; Tesoura; Servir/buffet; Com ponta de silicone; Açúcar; Pinças; Outro
fi: Pihtien tyyppi: Bambu; Grillaus; Ruoanlaitto/yleiskäyttöinen; Jää; Pasta/spagetti; Leivonnainen; Salaatti; Sakset; Tarjoilu/buffet; Silikonikärkinen; Sokeri; Pinsetit; Muu
vi: Loại kẹp: Tre; Tiệc nướng/Nướng vỉ; Nấu ăn/đa dụng; Băng; Mì Ý/mì ống; Bánh ngọt; Xa lát; Cắt kéo; Phục vụ/tự chọn; Đầu bọc silicon; Đường; Nhíp; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta hvataljki: Bambus; Roštilj; Kuhanje / opća namjena; Na ledu; Tjestenina/špageti; Tijesta; Salata; Škare; Posluživanje / švedski stol; Sa silikonskim vrhom; Šećer; Pinceta; Ostalo
fr: Type de pince: Bambou; Barbecue/grillades; Usage culinaire/général; Glace; Pâtes/spaghettis; Pâtisserie; Salade; Ciseaux; Service/buffet; Embouts en silicone; Sucre; Pince à épiler; Autre
it: Tipo di pinza: Bamboo; Barbecue/grigliate; Cottura/uso generale; Ghiaccio; Pasta/spaghetti; Pasticceria; Insalata; Forbice; Servizio/buffet; Con punta in silicone; Zucchero; Pinzetta; Altro
sv: Typ av tång: Bambu; Grillning/grillning; Matlagning/allmänt bruk; Is; Pasta/spagetti; Bakverk; Sallad; Sax; Servering/buffé; Silikonbelagd; Socker; pincett; Annat
hu: Fogó típusa: Bambusz; Barbecue/grillezés; Főzés/általános célú; Jég; Tészta/spagetti; Cukrászsütemény; Saláta; Olló; Tálalás/büfé; Szilikonvégű; Cukor; Csipesz; Egyéb